South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-15-210 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (3) "Legal custody" means an award of the rights of legal custody of a minor under which a parent has legal custodial rights and responsibilities toward the minor child including, but not limited to, decision making affecting the minor's legal status, medical care, education, extracurricular activities, and religious instruction. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----